New York, session 2025-2026, A5412.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 267-c to read as follows: 3 § 267-c. Statewide fibroid study program. The commissioner shall 4 establish within the department a statewide fibroid study program 5 through which the department will study and evaluate the occurrence of 6 fibroids and the alleviation of pain caused by these tumors. This 7 program shall: 8 (a) examine and evaluate current research and progress in the study of 9 fibroids; 10 (b) examine and evaluate current treatment methods for fibroids; 11 (c) identify potential barriers to access to treatment for fibroids; 12 (d) examine the symptoms and effects of fibroids on women of color; 13 (e) identify any potential barriers to access to treatment for 14 fibroids, in addition to barriers identified pursuant to paragraph (h) 15 of this subdivision, for women of color; 16 (f) make recommendations as the development of treatment methods for 17 fibroids; 18 (g) make recommendations to remove any potential barriers to access to 19 treatment of fibroids; and 20 (h) make recommendations to remove any potential barriers to access to 21 treatment of fibroids specific to potential barriers to access to treat- 22 ment faced by women of color. 23 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 24 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08100-02-6